Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1918
Appeal; bond; approval; by whom made.

Before any bond executed as aforesaid shall operate as a supersedeas, the execution of the same, and the sufficiency of the sureties therein, must be approved by the clerk of the court in which the judgment or decree was rendered or the final order was made.

G.S.1873, c. 57, § 4, p. 717;

R.S.1913, § 8191;

C.S.1922, § 9143;

C.S.1929, § 20-1918;

R.S.1943, § 25-1918.

If sureties are responsible, clerk must approve. State ex rel. Beard v. Cook, 51 Neb. 822, 71 N.W. 733 (1897).